Nebraska, session 109, LB143.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
Section 1. Section 79-215, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
79-215 (1) Except as otherwise provided in this section, a student is a
resident of the school district where he or she resides and shall be admitted
to any such school district upon request without charge.
(2) A school board shall admit a student upon request without charge if at
least one of the student's parents resides in the school district.
(3) A school board shall admit any homeless student upon request without
charge if the district is the district in which the student (a) is currently
located, (b) attended when permanently housed, or (c) was last enrolled.
(4) A school board may allow a student whose residency in the district
ceases during a school year to continue attending school in such district for
the remainder of that school year.
(5) A school board may admit nonresident students to the school district
pursuant to a contract with the district where the student is a resident and
shall collect tuition pursuant to the contract.
(6) A school board may admit nonresident students to the school district
pursuant to the enrollment option program as authorized by sections 79-232 to
79-246, and such admission shall be without charge.
(7) In order to carry out the provisions of section 79-2201, a school
board shall permit children of military families to enroll preliminarily in a
school district if a parent presents evidence of military orders that the
military family will be stationed in this state during the current or following
school year. Such preliminary enrollment and any advanced enrollment policies
related to a child of a military family shall also apply if such child has an
individualized family service plan, has an individualized education program
under the federal Individuals with Disabilities Education Act, 20 U.S.C. 1400
et seq., receives special accommodations or services under section 504 of the
federal Rehabilitation Act of 1973, 29 U.S.C. 794, or receives special
education as defined in section 79-1125. A student of a military family shall
be admitted to the school district without charge upon arrival in Nebraska if
the requirements of this section are met.
(8) A school board may admit a student who is a resident of another state
to the school district and collect tuition in advance at a rate determined by
the school board.
(9) When a student as a ward of the state or as a ward of any court (a)
has been placed in a school district other than the district in which he or she
resided at the time he or she became a ward and such ward does not reside in a
foster family home licensed or approved by the Department of Health and Human
Services or a foster home maintained or used pursuant to section 83-108.04 or
(b) has been placed in any institution which maintains a special education
program which has been approved by the State Department of Education and such
institution is not owned or operated by the district in which he or she resided
at the time he or she became a ward, the cost of his or her education and the
required transportation costs associated with the student's education shall be
paid by the state, but not in advance, to the receiving school district or
approved institution under rules and regulations prescribed by the Department
of Health and Human Services and the student shall remain a resident of the
district in which he or she resided at the time he or she became a ward. Any
student who is a ward of the state or a ward of any court who resides in a
foster family home licensed or approved by the Department of Health and Human
Services or a foster home maintained or used pursuant to section 83-108.04
shall be deemed a resident of the district in which he or she resided at the
time he or she became a foster child, unless it is determined under section
43-1311 or 43-1312 that he or she will not attend such district in which case
he or she shall be deemed a resident of the district in which the foster family
home or foster home is located.
(10)(a) When a student is not a ward of the state or a ward of any court
and is residing in a residential setting located in Nebraska for reasons other
than to receive an education and the residential setting is operated by a
service provider which is certified or licensed by the Department of Health and
Human Services or is enrolled in the medical assistance program established
-1-

LB143 LB143
2025 2025
pursuant to the Medical Assistance Act and Title XIX or XXI of the federal
Social Security Act, as amended, the student shall remain a resident of the
district in which he or she resided immediately prior to residing in such
residential setting. The resident district for a student who is not a ward of
the state or a ward of any court does not change when the student moves from
one residential setting to another.
(b) If a student is residing in a residential setting as described in
subdivision (10)(a) of this section and such residential setting does not
maintain an interim-program school as defined in section 79-1119.01 or an
approved or accredited school, the resident school district shall contract with
the district in which such residential setting is located for the provision of
all educational services, including all special education services and support
services as defined in section 79-1125.01, unless a parent or guardian and the
resident school district agree that an appropriate education will be provided
by the resident school district while the student is residing in such
residential setting. If the resident school district is required to contract,
the district in which such residential setting is located shall contract with
the resident district and provide all educational services, including all
special education services, to the student. If the two districts cannot agree
on the amount of the contract, the State Department of Education shall
determine the amount to be paid by the resident district to the district in
which such residential setting is located based on the needs of the student,
approved special education rates, the department's general experience with
special education budgets, and the cost per student in the district in which
such residential setting is located. Once the contract has been entered into,
all legal responsibility for special education and related services shall be
transferred to the school district in which the residential setting is located.
(c) If a student is residing in a residential setting as described in
subdivision (10)(a) of this section and such residential setting maintains an
interim-program school as defined in section 79-1119.01 or an approved or
accredited school, the department shall reimburse such residential setting for
the provision of all educational services, including all special education
services and support services, with the amount of payment for all educational
services determined pursuant to the average per pupil cost of the service
agency as defined in section 79-1116. The resident school district shall retain
responsibility for such student's individualized education plan, if any. The
educational services may be provided through (i) such interim-program school or
approved or accredited school, (ii) a contract between the residential setting
and the school district in which such residential setting is located, (iii) a
contract between the residential setting and another service agency as defined
in section 79-1124, or (iv) a combination of such educational service
providers.
(d) If a school district pays a school district in which a residential
setting is located for educational services provided pursuant to subdivision
(10)(b) of this section and it is later determined that a different school
district was the resident school district for such student at the time such
educational services were provided, the school district that was later
determined to be the resident school district shall reimburse the school
district that initially paid for the educational services one hundred ten
percent of the amount paid.
(e) A student residing in a residential setting described in this
subsection shall be defined as a student with a handicap pursuant to Article
VII, section 11, of the Constitution of Nebraska, and as such the state and any
political subdivision may contract with institutions not wholly owned or
controlled by the state or any political subdivision to provide the educational
services to the student if such educational services are nonsectarian in
nature.
(11) A school board shall ensure that any preliminary or advanced
enrollment policies of a school district that apply to a student enrolling in
such school also apply to a student enrolling in such school that has an
individualized family service plan, has an individualized education program
under the federal Individuals with Disabilities Education Act, 20 U.S.C. 1400
et seq., receives special accommodations or services under section 504 of the
federal Rehabilitation Act of 1973, 29 U.S.C. 794, or receives special
education as defined in section 79-1125.
(12) (11) In the case of any individual eighteen years of age or younger
who is a ward of the state or any court and who is placed in a county detention
home established under section 43-2,110, the cost of his or her education shall
be paid by the state, regardless of the district in which he or she resided at
the time he or she became a ward, to the agency or institution which: (a) Is
selected by the county board with jurisdiction over such detention home; (b)
has agreed or contracted with such county board to provide educational
services; and (c) has been approved by the State Department of Education
pursuant to rules and regulations prescribed by the State Board of Education.
(13) (12) No tuition shall be charged for students who may be by law
allowed to attend the school without charge.
(14) (13) The State Department of Education shall establish procedures and
criteria for collecting enrollment, admission, and related information needed
for any student to attend a school district in this state which shall include,
but not be limited to, having an adult with legal or actual charge or control
of a student provide through electronic means or other means specified by the
department the name of the student, the name of the adult with legal or actual
charge or control of the student, the address where the student is or will be
-2-

LB143 LB143
2025 2025
residing, and information on how and where the adult may generally be reached
during the school day.
(15) (14) The department may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to
carry out the provisions of this section.
Sec. 2. Original section 79-215, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
repealed.
-3-